North Carolina statutes. Chapter 54. Cooperative Organizations.
Article 16. Organization of Associations.

§ 54-111.
Nature of the association.

Any number of persons, not less than five, may associate themselves as a mutual association, society, company, or exchange, for the purpose of conducting any agricultural, housing (including apartment housing), horticultural, forestry, dairy, mercantile, mining, manufacturing, telephone, electric light, power, storage, refrigeration, flume, irrigation, water, sewerage, or mechanical business, or purchase, maintain and use fire-fighting equipment, or for any other lawful purpose, on the mutual plan. For the purposes of this Subchapter, the words association, company, corporation, exchange, society, or union shall be construed to mean the same; provided that the membership of agricultural organizations incorporated under this Subchapter shall consist of producers of agricultural products, handled by such organizations or by organizations owned and controlled by such producers.

History.

1915, c. 144, s. 1; C.S., s. 5242; 1925, c. 179, ss. 1, 2; 1931, c. 447; 1949, c. 1042, ss. 1, 2(a); 1955, c. 746, s. 1; 1959, c. 991; 1985, c. 542, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on the Declaratory Judgment Act and due process in expulsions from voluntary trade associations, in light of Harrison v. Gaston Bd. of Realtors, Inc.,

311 N.C. 230

, 316 S.E.2d 59 (1984), see 21 Wake Forest L. Rev. 121 (1985).

§ 54-111.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1959, c. 991.

§ 54-112.
Use of term restricted.

No corporation or association hereafter organized or doing business for profit in this State shall be entitled to use the term “mutual” as part of its corporate or other business name or title, unless it has complied with the provisions of this Subchapter; and any corporation or association violating the provisions of this section may be enjoined from doing business under such name at the instance of any shareholder of any association legally organized under this Subchapter.

History.

1915, c. 144, s. 18; C.S., s. 5243; 1925, c. 179, s. 1; 1945, c. 635.

§ 54-113.
Articles of agreement.

The persons desiring to organize such association shall sign and acknowledge written articles which shall contain the name of the association and the names and residences of the persons forming the same. Such articles shall also contain a statement of the purposes of the association and shall designate the city, town, or village where its principal place of business shall be located. The articles shall also state the amount of authorized capital stock, the number of shares authorized, and the par value of each. No shareholder in any corporation organized under this Subchapter shall be personally liable for any debt of the corporation.

History.

1915, c. 144, s. 2; C.S., s. 5244; 1985, c. 542, s. 2.

§ 54-114.
Certificate of incorporation.

The original articles of incorporation of corporations organized under this Subchapter, or a true copy thereof, verified as such by the affidavits of two of the signers thereof, shall be filed with the Secretary of State. A like verified copy of such articles and certificate of the Secretary of State, showing the date when such articles were filed with and accepted by the Secretary of State, within 30 days of such filing and acceptance, shall be filed with and recorded by the register of deeds of the county in which the principal place of business of the corporation is to be located, and no corporation shall, until such articles be left for record, have legal existence. The register of deeds shall forthwith transmit to the Secretary of State a certificate stating the time when such copy was recorded. Upon a receipt of such certificate, the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of incorporation.

History.

1915, c. 144, s. 3; C.S., s. 5245; 1967, c. 823, s. 12.

§ 54-115.
Fees for incorporation.

For filing the articles of incorporation of corporations organized under this Subchapter, there shall be paid the Secretary of State ten dollars ($10.00) and his fees allowed by law, and for the filing of an amendment to such articles, five dollars ($5.00) and his fees allowed by law: Provided, that when the authorized capital stock of such corporations shall be less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), such fee for filing either the articles of incorporation or amendments thereto shall be two dollars ($2.00).

History.

1915, c. 144, s. 4; C.S., s. 5246; 1967, c. 823, s. 13.

§ 54-116.
Bylaws adopted.

At the time of making the articles of incorporation the incorporators shall make bylaws which shall provide:

The name of the corporation.

The purposes for which it is formed.

Qualifications for membership.

The date of the annual meeting; the manner in which members shall be notified of meetings; the manner of conducting the meetings; the number of members which shall constitute a quorum at the meetings, and regulations as to voting.

The number of members of the board of directors; powers and duties; the compensation and duties of officers elected by the board of directors.

In the case of selling agencies or productive societies, regulations for grading.

In the case of selling agencies or productive societies, regulations governing the sale of products by the members through the organization.

The par value of the shares of capital stock.

The conditions upon which shares may be issued, paid in, transferred, and withdrawn.

The manner in which the reserve fund shall be accumulated.

The manner in which the dividends shall be determined and paid to members.

Associations, societies, companies or exchanges, organized hereunder to engage in the telephone or electric light business upon a mutual basis, shall adopt a bylaw limiting the patrons and subscribers to members of the association.

In the case of apartment housing, regulations governing the rental of apartments.

History.

1915, c. 144, s. 5; C.S., s. 5247; 1925, c. 179, s. 4; 1959, c. 991.

§ 54-117.
General corporation law or general nonprofit corporation law applied; dealing in products of, or renting to, nonmembers.

All mutual associations shall be maintained in accordance with the general corporation law or general nonprofit corporation law, except as otherwise provided for in this Subchapter. And no corporation or association hereafter organized under this Subchapter for doing business in this State shall be permitted to deal in the products of nonmembers to an amount greater in value than such as are handled by it for members: Provided, no housing corporation or association hereafter organized under this Subchapter shall be permitted to rent to nonmembers for a period longer than 90 days.

History.

1915, c. 144, s. 17; C.S., s. 5248; 1925, c. 179, s. 1; 1931, c. 447, s. 2; 1949, c. 1042, s. 2(b); 1985, c. 542, s. 3.

§ 54-118.
Other corporations admitted.

All mutual corporations, companies, or associations heretofore organized and doing business under other incorporation statutes, or which have attempted to so organize and do business, shall have the benefit of all of the provisions of this Subchapter, and be bound thereby on filing with the Secretary of State a written declaration, signed and sworn to by the president and secretary, to the effect that the mutual company or association has by a majority vote of its shareholders decided to accept the benefits of and to be bound by the provisions of this Subchapter. No association organized under this Subchapter shall be required to do or perform anything not specifically required herein, in order to become a corporation.

History.

1915, c. 144, s. 16; C.S., s. 5249; 1925, c. 179, s. 1; 1985, c. 542, s. 4.

§ 54-118.1.
License taxes.

On and after June 1, 1955, the provisions of Article 2, Subchapter I of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes of North Carolina shall apply to an association or corporation organized under the provisions of this Subchapter.

History.

1955, c. 1313, s. 1.

§ 54-118.2.
Franchise taxes.

On and after July 1, 1955, the provisions of Article 3, Subchapter I of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes of North Carolina shall apply to an association or corporation organized under the provisions of this Subchapter.

History.

1955, c. 1313, s. 1.